dictionaries/cs/index.dic
akceptovat/ATN
angažovat/ATN
asimilovat/ATN
bandážovat/ATN
bloumat/JTN
brakovat/ATN
burcovat/ATN
centralizovat/ATN
chrstat/JTN
clonit/ATN
cáknout/ATN
degazovat/ATN
dementovat/ATN
deregulovat/ATN
dešifrovávat/JTN
dlabat/AJTN
dobimbat/JTN
dobásnit/ATN
docirkulovat/ATN
dodloubat/AJTN
doděkovat/ATN
dohajlovat/ATN
dohryzávat/JTN
dojídat/JTN
dokokrhat/JTN
dokouřit/ATN
dokutávat/JTN
dolinkovat/ATN
domatlat/JTN
domrvit/ATN
donýtovat/ATN
dopatlat/JTN
dopodkuřovávat/JTN
doprosit/ATN
dopřát/BTN
dorýpat/AJTN
dosmýčit/ATN
dostrčit/ATN
dosídlovávat/JTN
dotlumočit/ATN
dotřídit/ATN
dovršovat/ATN
dověštit/ATN
dozvánět/JTN
dořešit/ATN
došpendlovat/ATN
doťuknout/ATN
drchat/JTN
dupnout/AJTN
ejakulovat/ATN
exemplifikovat/ATN
fasovat/ATN
formovat/ATN
gaufrovat/ATN
hanět/AJTN
hnout/JTN
hrabávat/JTN
hydratovat/ATN
implementovat/ATN
iniciovat/ATN
interpretovávat/JTN
jitřit/ATN
kandysovat/ATN
klepat/AJTN
knoflíkovat/ATN
kombinovat/ATN
konfigurovat/ATN
konzervovat/ATN
koupat/AJTN
kroužkovávat/JTN
kutat/JTN
kálet/JTN
lapit/ATN
liberalizovat/ATN
louskávat/JTN
macerovat/ATN
mazat/ATN
minout/ATN
motávat/JTN
mydlit/ATN
naaranžovat/ATN
nabulíkovávat/JTN
nactiutrhat/JTN
nadimenzovat/ATN
nadskakovávat/JTN
nadřít/ATN
nahlídnout/ATXN
naistalovat/ATN
naklouzkovat/ATN
nakrajovávat/JTN
nakysat/AJTN
naloupit/ATN
nametávat/JTN
namířit/ATN
napatlat/JTN
napolohovat/ATN
napučet/ATN
narubávat/JTN
naslibovat/ATN
nastehnout/ATN
nastřádat/JTN
natančit/ATN
natřískat/JTN
navracet/AJTN
naznat/JTXN
načrtávat/JTN
našminkovat/ATN
naťuknout/ATN
nežrat/AT
obcházet/JTN
obestřít/ATN
obkládat/JTN
obléct/ATN
obnášet/JTN
obsekávat/JTN
obtiskovat/ATN
obzírat/JTN
ocejchovat/ATN
odalkoholizovávat/JTN
odbíjet/JTN
oddat/JTN
odehrávat/JTN
odfiltrovávat/JTN
odhmyzit/ATN
odizolovávat/JTN
odklízet/JTN
odkráglovat/ATN
odleptat/JTN
odmagnetizovávat/JTN
odmořovat/ATN
odosobňovat/ATN
odplácet/AJTN
odprodávat/JTN
odrbat/AJTN
odsexualizovat/ATN
odstrkávat/JTN
odstřílet/JTN
odtransportovat/ATN
odvažovat/ATN
odvzdušovat/ATN
odzpívávat/JTN
odřečtit/ATN
odšupovat/ATN
ohlušovat/ATN
ojídávat/JTN
okouzlovávat/JTN
olamovávat/JTN
omilostňovat/ATN
onálepkovat/ATN
opilovat/ATN
opominout/ATN
optovat/ATN
orovnávat/JTN
oslintávat/JTN
ostřelovávat/JTN
otapetovat/ATN
otročit/ATN
ovládnout/ATN
označkovávat/JTN
očmuchat/JTN
ošoupat/AJTN
ožírat/JTN
parkovávat/JTN
permutovat/ATN
plenit/ATN
pobalovávat/JTN
pochodovat/ATN
podbarvovat/ATN
podezdít/ATN
podlepovat/ATN
podněcovat/ATN
podseknout/ATN
podupat/JTN
podškrtat/JTN
pohoupat/AJTN
pojmenovávat/JTN
pokovit/ATXN
pokřtít/ATN
polívat/JTN
pomíjet/JTN
poopravit/ATN
popouzet/JTN
poreferovat/ATN
posilovávat/JTN
postlat/ITN
posukovat/ATN
potopit/ATN
povadat/JTN
povzbuzovat/ATN
pozeptat/JTXN
počmárat/JTN
pošpinit/ATN
pranýřovat/ATN
probodnout/ATN
procházívat/JTN
prodražit/ATN
proflinkat/JTN
prohospodařit/ATN
projevit/ATN
proklučit/ATN
prokrokovat/ATN
prolistovat/ATN
promluvit/ATN
proměřit/ATN
proplachovávat/JTN
propukávat/JTN
prosednout/ATN
prosrat/ATNw
prosykat/JTN
protopit/ATN
provinit/ATN
provívat/JTN
pročmuchat/JTN
prošlehnout/ATN
pruhovat/ATN
pálit/ATN
přebalovávat/JTN
přechovávat/JTN
předepisovat/ATN
předklonit/ATN
přednačíst/ATN
předražovat/ATN
předtrhat/JTN
předznamenávat/JTN
předžhavit/ATN
přehlušovat/ATN
přehánět/JTN
překlepávat/JTN
překousat/JTN
překvalifikovat/ATN
přelidnit/ATN
přemlouvat/JTN
přendávat/JTN
přepilotovávat/JTN
přeprat/ATN
přepřahat/JTN
přesidlovávat/JTN
přestoupit/ATXN
přesypat/AJTN
přetransportovat/ATN
přeučovat/ATN
převyšovat/ATN
přezpívat/JTN
přečůrávat/JTN
přešmiknout/ATN
přežívat/JTN
přidat/JTN
přihrnovat/ATN
přikopírovat/ATN
přikyselit/ATN
přimhuřovávat/JTN
připakovat/ATN
připojovat/ATN
přiroubovat/ATN
přistrouhat/JTN
přitesat/AJTN
přivlastňovat/ATN
přizavírat/JTN
přiškrabat/AJTN
přímit/ATN
realokovat/ATN
rehydratovat/ATN
remilitarizovat/ATN
restartovat/ATN
rohovatět/AJTN
rozbouřit/ATN
rozchytat/JTN
rozdrobovat/ATN
rozedrat/ATN
rozetřít/ATN
rozhazovat/ATN
rozhryzat/AJTN
rozkašlat/ATN
rozkoukat/JTN
rozkulhávat/JTN
rozlisovávat/JTN
rozmazávat/JTN
rozmísit/ACTN
rozostřovat/ATN
rozplácat/JTN
rozprostírat/JTN
rozpůlit/ATN
rozstrkovat/ATN
roztahat/JTN
roztápět/JTN
rozvibrovat/ATN
rozválcovat/ATN
rozčerpat/JTN
rozšišlat/JTN
rozšrotovat/ATN
rozžvýknout/ATN
sabotovat/ATN
scentrovat/ATN
sdělovávat/JTN
semknout/ATN
sesmilnit/ATN
sesílat/JTN
sešikovávat/JTN
sešívat/JTN
shrabávat/JTN
skelnatět/AJTN
skopnout/ATN
skřípávat/JTN
složit/ATN
smečovat/ATN
smývat/JTN
solit/ATN
spatřit/ATN
splácnout/AJTN
spolurozhodovat/AT
spravovovat/ATN
srozumět/AJTN
stmelovávat/JTN
stužovat/ATN
střásat/JTN
svahovat/ATN
svážet/AJTN
síťovat/ATN
tasit/ATN
titulkovat/ATN
transformovat/ATN
trápit/ATN
týrat/JTN
ubourat/JTN
uchylovávat/JTN
udrolovat/ATN
uhrabat/AJTN
ukdákat/JTN
ukotvit/ATN
ukázňovat/ATN
umenšovat/ATN
umíchávat/JTN
upgradovat/ATN
upovídat/JTN
upřesnit/ATN
usidlovat/ATN
usnášet/JTN
ustrážit/ATN
utišit/ATN
utápět/JTN
uvolnit/ATN
uzmout/JTN
uškrabat/AJTN
uždibovávat/JTN
vcvaknout/ATN
verifikovávat/JTN
vinit/ATN
vlamovávat/JTN
vmetávat/JTN
volávat/JTN
vraždit/ATN
vstřikovat/ATN
vtělit/ATN
vyblokovat/ATN
vybuchnout/ATN
vychlipovat/ATN
vycvakávat/JTN
vydolovat/ATN
vydusat/JTN
vyfintit/ATN
vyhlubovat/ATN
vyhryzat/AJTN
vyjevovat/ATN
vykličkovat/ATN
vykonstruovávat/JTN
vykrmovat/ATN
vykvedlávat/JTN
vylepšovat/ATN
vylučovat/ATN
vymezovat/ATN
vymést/ATN
vynucovat/ATN
vypilotovávat/JTN
vyplýtvat/JTN
vypracovávat/JTN
vyprázdnit/ATN
vypřahat/JTN
vyrvávat/JTN
vyskákat/ATN
vysoupeřit/ATN
vystrkávat/JTN
vysublimovat/ATN
vytančit/ATN
vytmelovávat/JTN
vytížit/ATN
vyvdat/JTN
vyvzpomenout/ATN
vyzkoumávat/JTN
vyzvracet/AJTN
vyčurávat/JTN
vyšamponovat/ATN
vyšmelit/ATN
vyšvindlovat/ATN
vyžírat/JTN
vznést/ATN
vázat/ATN
vřezat/AJTN
zabarikádovat/ATN
zabrat/ATXN
zabřeznout/ATN
zaclonit/ATN
zadlužit/ATN
zafidlat/JTN
zahlcovat/ATN
zahrozit/ATN
zaisolovat/ATN
zaklapávat/JTN
zakomponovávat/JTN
zakreslit/ATN
zakuňkat/JTN
zalednit/ATN
zalívat/JTN
zamlčovat/ATN
zaměstnat/JTN
zaobalit/ATN
zapaspartovávat/JTN
zapojit/ATN
zaprovokovávat/JTN
zapříčiňovat/ATN
zasahovat/ATN
zasolit/ATN
zastřihovat/ATN
zasýpat/JTN
zatmít/JTN
zatřídit/ATN
zavlnit/ATN
zavíčkovat/ATN
začesat/AJTN
zašepotat/JTN
zašmátrat/JTN
zašňupat/AJTN
zbavit/ATN
zburcovávat/JTN
zdaňovat/ATN
zdokumentovat/ATN
zdvojnásobovat/ATN
zeslabit/ATN
zeštíhlovávat/JTN
zhltnout/ATN
zhušťovat/ATN
zironizovat/ATN
zklamávat/JTN
zkonfiskovávat/JTN
zkovávat/JTN
zkypřovat/ATN
zlákat/JTN
zmetávat/JTN
zmrskat/JTN
znacionalizovat/ATN
znenápadnit/ATN
znetvářet/AJTN
znovunavlékat/JTN
znárodnět/AJTN
zohýbat/AJTN
zpanenštit/ATN
zpodrobňovat/ATN
zprocesnit/ATN
zpytovávat/JTN
zradikalizovat/ATN
zrestaurovat/ATN
ztenčovat/ATN
ztužit/ATN
zvelebovat/ATN
zvonit/ATN
zvěrohodňovat/ATN
zútulnit/ATN
účinkovat/ATN
čipovat/ATN
řetězit/ATN
šifrovávat/JTN
šluknout/ATN
šrafovat/ATN
švitořit/ATN
ženit/ATN
